apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUÀÈÌÒÙÁÉÍÓÚabcdefghilmnoprstuàèìòùáéíóú</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>

    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>

    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>

    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>

    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="con"/>
    <sdef n="dis"/>
    <sdef n="int"/>

    <sdef n="aut"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>

    <sdef n="mon"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?ú</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="currency">
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!·]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Mutations -->

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bh</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mb</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-c">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gc</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fh</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bhf</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-p">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ph</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bp</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-s">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sh</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-t">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dt</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-vowel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t-</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nA</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t-a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tA</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-á">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-á</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nÁ</l>
          <r>Á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t-á</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tÁ</l>
          <r>Á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>há</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-e">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nE</l>
          <r>E</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t-e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>tE</l>
          <r>E</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>he</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="damáiste"><par n="initial-d"/><i>amáist</i><par n="sít/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clóiríniú"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lóiríni</i><par n="ídi/ú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ae"><par n="initial-a"/><i>e</i><par n="zú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bonnleibhéal"><par n="initial-b"/><i>onnleibhé</i><par n="idé/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáth"><par n="initial-f"/><i>áth</i><par n="am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eascainí"><par n="initial-e"/><i>ascain</i><par n="eascain/í__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ball"><par n="initial-b"/><i>a</i><par n="ba/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áras"><par n="initial-á"/><i>ra</i><par n="gá/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cluimhriú"><par n="initial-c"/><i>luimhri</i><par n="ídi/ú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deirmeolaí"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eirmeola</i><par n="hip/í__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athshondas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thshonda</i><par n="ú/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foirgníocht"><par n="initial-f"/><i>oirgníocht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eicsigéis"><par n="initial-e"/><i>icsigéis</i><par n="min__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodairlín"><par n="initial-b"/><i>odairlín</i><par n="ápa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cartús"><par n="initial-c"/><i>artú</i><par n="gá/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dea-chríoch"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ea-chrí</i><par n="éigrí/och__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áitreabhach"><par n="initial-á"/><i>itreabha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiafraitheacht"><par n="initial-f"/><i>iafraitheacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aolchuisne"><par n="initial-a"/><i>olchuisn</i><par n="sít/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eisíth"><par n="initial-e"/><i>isíth</i><par n="min__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clamh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lamh</i><par n="anas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="béarlagair"><par n="initial-b"/><i>éarlagair</i><par n="rú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áscú"><par n="initial-á"/><i>sc</i><par n="ór/ú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diftéire"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iftéire</i><par n="Mí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáibhile"><par n="initial-f"/><i>áibhil</i><par n="sít/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainbhios"><par n="initial-a"/><i>inbh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áit"><par n="initial-á"/><i>it</i><par n="tíl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cealgaireacht"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ealgaireacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bundúchasach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>undúchasa</i><par n="Ulta/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eipsealón"><par n="initial-e"/><i>ipsealó</i><par n="fá/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dea-mhéin"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ea-mhéin</i><par n="min__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guailleáin"><par n="initial-g"/><i>uailleáin</i><par n="ba__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pluid"><par n="initial-p"/><i>luid</i><par n="tíl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maisteog"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aisteo</i><par n="cruó/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grideall"><par n="initial-g"/><i>rid</i><par n="grid/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pacaire"><par n="initial-p"/><i>acair</i><par n="sít/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meánmhúinteoir"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eánmhúinteo</i><par n="almó/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gibreacht"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ibreacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuaim"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uaim</i><par n="tíl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seaimpéin"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eaimpéin</i><par n="rú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piochán"><par n="initial-p"/><i>iochá</i><par n="ia/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maintíneacht"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aintíneacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnáthrud"><par n="initial-g"/><i>náthrud</i><par n="ab__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muiscít"><par n="initial-m"/><i>uiscít</i><par n="ailm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pátrúnacht"><par n="initial-p"/><i>átrúnacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stampa"><par n="initial-s"/><i>tampa</i><par n="ápa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tionóntacht"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ionóntacht</i><par n="eang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teallaireacht"><par n="initial-t"/><i>eallaireacht</i><par n="ócht__n"/></e>
    <e lm="striapach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>triapa</i><par n="cura/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tumaire"><par n="initial-t"/><i>umair</i><par n="sít/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinsearach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>inseara</i><par n="Ulta/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tribil"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ribil</i><par n="ailm__n"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
